Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.660

Collected moneys, civil penalties—Deposit.

(1) All moneys collected under this chapter shall be placed in the weights and measures account created in RCW 19.94.185.

(2) Civil penalties collected under RCW 15.80.650 must be deposited into the state general fund.

[ 2017 c 158 s 15; 1995 c 355 s 25.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.